Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-306 Effect of guaranteeing
signature, indorsement, or instruction. (a) A person who guarantees a
signature of an indorser of a security certificate warrants that at the time of
signing:

(1) The signature was genuine;

(2) The signer was an appropriate person to indorse,
or if the signature is by an agent, the agent had actual authority to act on
behalf of the appropriate person; and

(3) The signer had legal capacity to sign.

(b) A person who guarantees a signature of the
originator of an instruction warrants that at the time of signing:

(1) The signature was genuine;

(2) The signer was an appropriate person to originate
the instruction, or if the signature is by an agent, the agent had actual
authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person, if the person specified
in the instruction as the registered owner was, in fact, the registered owner,
as to which fact the signature guarantor does not make a warranty; and

(3) The signer had legal capacity to sign.

(c) A person who specially guarantees the
signature of an originator of an instruction makes the warranties of a
signature guarantor under subsection (b) and also warrants that at the time the
instruction is presented to the issuer:

(1) The person specified in the instruction as the registered
owner of the uncertificated security will be the registered owner; and

(2) The transfer of the uncertificated security
requested in the instruction will be registered by the issuer free from all
liens, security interests, restrictions, and claims other than those specified
in the instruction.

(d) A guarantor under subsections (a) and (b)
or a special guarantor under subsection (c) does not otherwise warrant the
rightfulness of the transfer.

(e) A person who guarantees an indorsement of
a security certificate makes the warranties of a signature guarantor under
subsection (a) and also warrants the rightfulness of the transfer in all
respects.

(f) A person who guarantees an instruction
requesting the transfer of an uncertificated security makes the warranties of a
special signature guarantor under subsection (c) and also warrants the
rightfulness of the transfer in all respects.

(g) An issuer may not require a special
guaranty of signature, a guaranty of indorsement, or a guaranty of instruction
as a condition to registration of transfer.

(h) The warranties under this section are made
to a person taking or dealing with the security in reliance on the guaranty,
and the guarantor is liable to the person for loss resulting from their
breach. An indorser or originator of an instruction whose signature,
indorsement, or instruction has been guaranteed is liable to a guarantor for
any loss suffered by the guarantor as a result of breach of the warranties of
the guarantor. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next